Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.030

Security guard license—Requirements.

An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain a private security guard license:

(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;

(2) Be a citizen of the United States or a resident alien;

(3) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly relates to his or her capacity to perform the duties of a private security guard, and the director determines that the license should be withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. The director shall make her or his determination to withhold a license because of previous convictions notwithstanding the restoration of employment rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;

(4) Be employed by or have an employment offer from a licensed private security company or be licensed as a private security company;

(5) Satisfy the training requirements established by the director;

(6) Submit a set of fingerprints; however, if an applicant has been issued a license as a private investigator under chapter 18.165 RCW within the last twelve months, the applicant is not required to undergo a separate background check to become licensed under this chapter;

(7) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application; and

(8) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper identification on a form prescribed by the director for each company of employment.

[ 2012 c 118 s 2; 1995 c 277 s 1; 1991 c 334 s 3.]